Utah statutes.
62A-3-304.   Cooperation by caretaker.

A caretaker, facility, or other institution shall, regardless of the confidentiality standards of the caretaker, facility, or institution:

(1)  report abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult in accordance with this chapter;

(2)  cooperate with any Adult Protective Services investigation;

(3)  provide Adult Protective Services with access to records or documents relating to the vulnerable adult who is the subject of an investigation; or

(4)  provide evidence in any judicial or administrative proceeding relating to a vulnerable adult who is the subject of an investigation.

